California statutes. Water Code
-------------------------------------------

36605.

After hearing all objections and evidence, the board of supervisors shall:

(a) Add to or deduct from the valuation assessed to any parcel of land a percent thereof sufficient to raise it or reduce it to its full cash value.

(b) Fix the full cash value of any land that has not been assessed.

(c) In the case of lands assessed pursuant to Section 36577, change the assessed value of any parcel so as to reflect the proportional benefit
 bestowed upon the parcel by the operations of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 162, Sec. 3.   Effective June 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

36606.

Any changes or additions ordered by the board of supervisors, acting as a board of equalization, shall be entered in the assessment book in the proper place and the order shall be endorsed on the margin of the entry, signed by the chairman, and attested by the clerk of the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36607.

Before the hearing is closed the assessor shall add the total values as determined by the board of supervisors and determine the gross assessed valuation of all the land and make a statement thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36608.

After the statement is completed, the board of supervisors, acting as a board of equalization, shall fix an ad valorem rate of assessment upon each one hundred dollars ($100) in value of the land assessed sufficient to raise the sums specified in the annual estimate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36609.

After fixing the rate of assessment, the board of supervisors shall adjourn as a board of equalization and the hearing is completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36610.

The orders of the board of supervisors made at the hearing are final and when endorsed on or attached to the assessment book are conclusive evidence that the assessment was made and levied in accordance with the law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36611.

Any person interested in land and aggrieved by a decision of the board of supervisors may, in order to have an assessment or levy thereon corrected, modified, or annulled, institute an action therefor in the superior court of the principal county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Levy [36725. - 36729.]

36725.

Within 10 days after the hearing on assessment is completed, duplicate copies of each of the following shall be signed by the president and secretary and attached to the last volume of each part of the assessment book:

(a) The statement of the assessor showing the total valuation of the land assessed.

(b) The order of the board of supervisors fixing the rate of assessment on the land.

(c) The annual estimate of the board of directors. Thereupon the assessment is
 completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36726.

Within 10 days after the assessment is completed, the assessor shall do each of the following:

(a) Compute and charge in the proper part of the assessment book in a place provided therefor in the record of each parcel of land assessed the assessment due on the parcel.

(b) In the event the annual assessment for any parcel of land separately assessed, computed pursuant to (a) above, is less than two dollars ($2), a minimum annual assessment may be set by the board which shall not exceed two dollars ($2) for each separately assessed parcel of land,
 and upon such a determination the assessor shall enter that assessment for each separately assessed parcel of land for which the annual assessment is less than the amount set by the board.

(c) If authorized by the board of directors by resolution, add to the assessment of each parcel of land any charges for water and other services, or either, which are unpaid. The amount so added shall be collected and shall constitute a lien as a part of the assessment levied on the parcel upon which the water for which the charges are unpaid was used and upon the lands subject to the unpaid charges for any other services.

(d) File each separate part of the assessment book with the tax collector of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

36727.

After each separate part of the assessment book has been filed with the tax collector the assessments listed are due and payable to the tax collector of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36728.

No action to determine the validity of any district assessment or assessment levied thereon shall be maintained unless the action is commenced within 30 days after all separate parts of the assessment book are filed with the tax collector.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36729.

In case any charges for water or other services, or either, remain unpaid the amount of the unpaid charges may in the discretion of the district be secured at any time by filing for record in the office of the county recorder of any county, a certificate specifying the amount of such charges and the name and address of the person liable therefor.

From the time of recordation of the certificate, the amount required to be paid together with interest and penalty constitutes a lien upon all real property in the county owned by the person or afterwards, and before the lien expires, acquired by him. The lien has the force, priority, and
 effect of a judgment lien and shall continue for 10 years from the date of the filing of the certificate unless sooner released or otherwise discharged. The lien may, within 10 years from the filing of the certificate or within 10 years from the date of the last extension of the lien in the manner herein provided, be extended by filing for record a new certificate in the office of the county recorder of any county and from the time of such filing the lien shall be extended to the real property in such county for 10 years unless sooner released or otherwise discharged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 335.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Collection [36825. - 36833.]

36825.

After the filing of all parts of the assessment book with the tax collector the assessment on each parcel of land separately assessed and any penalties for delinquency added thereto plus any unpaid charges for water and other services added to the assessment under the provisions of Section 36726 are a lien on the land and impart notice of the lien to all persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

36826.

Within 10 days after each assessment is due and payable, the assessor shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation published in the principal county a notice specifying all of the following:

(a) The date on which the assessments became due and payable to the tax collector.

(b) The time when the assessments will be delinquent, or, in the event the board has made an election as provided in Section 36950.5, the times when each half of the assessments will be delinquent.

(c) That
 upon delinquency a penalty of 5 percent of the amount delinquent will be added thereto and the delinquent property sold to the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 380.)
-------------------------------------------

36827.

Assessments shall be paid in lawful money of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36828.

The tax collector shall mark the date of payment in the assessment book opposite the name of the assessee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36829.

The tax collector shall give a receipt to the person making payment specifying:

(a) The land assessed.

(b) The amount of the assessment.

(c) The amount paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36830.

The tax collector shall pay the money received to the treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36830.1.

The tax collector may, in his discretion, accept negotiable paper in payment of any assessment or on a redemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 438.)
-------------------------------------------

36830.2.

As used herein, “negotiable paper” means bank checks and drafts and express and post office money orders payable on demand.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 438.)
-------------------------------------------

36830.3.

The acceptance of negotiable paper constitutes a payment of an assessment or redemption as of the date of acceptance when, but not before, the negotiable paper is duly paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 438.)
-------------------------------------------

36830.4.

If any negotiable paper is not paid on due presentment for any reason, any record of payment made on the assessment book because of its acceptance shall be canceled, and the assessment is a lien as though no payment had been attempted. The tax collector, when accepting negotiable paper, shall make any memoranda necessary to enable him to make proper cancellation on its return without payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 438.)
-------------------------------------------

36830.5.

When a cancellation is made the tax collector shall record it in the assessment book opposite the name of the assessee who attempted payment by the negotiable paper and shall promptly notify such assessee of the cancellation of the payment. The validity of any assessment or penalty is not affected by failure or irregularity in giving the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 438.)
-------------------------------------------

36830.6.

If a remittance to cover a payment required to be made on or before a specified date is sent through the United States mail, properly addressed with postage prepaid, it shall be determined received on the date shown by the post office cancellation mark stamped upon the envelope containing the remittance or on the date it was mailed if proof satisfactory to the tax collector establishes that the mailing occurred on an earlier date, provided, however, that the tax collector need not accept such a payment if it is received more than 30 days after the date on or before which the payment was delinquent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 380.)
-------------------------------------------

36831.

The board shall order the collector to cancel or modify, as may be proper, an assessment when it finds that any property has been either:

(a) Assessed in any year more than once.

(b) Assessed by reason of a clerical error for more than its full cash value. 

(c) Computed for assessment on an excessive acreage.

(d) Assessed while not in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2041.)
-------------------------------------------

36832.

On order of the board any assessments, penalties or costs thereon, or portions thereof, shall be refunded by the treasurer if they were either:

(a) Paid more than once.

(b) Erroneously or illegally collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2041.)
-------------------------------------------

36833.

No order for a refund under Section 36832 shall be made except upon a claim both:

(a) Verified by the person who paid the assessment, penalties, or costs, or by his guardian, executor or administrator.

(b) Filed within three years after the making of the payment sought to be refunded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2041.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Delinquency and Sale [36950. - 36960.]

36950.

Unpaid assessments are delinquent unless paid within six calendar months after they become due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

36950.1.

As used in this chapter and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 37050), Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 37150), and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 37175), “assessment” includes standby charges and other charges levied for the use of district water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1052, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

36950.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 36950, the board may, by resolution, provide that assessments may be paid in two equal installments, the first of which shall be delinquent if not paid within five calendar months after the assessments became due and the second of which shall be delinquent if not paid within nine calendar months after the assessments became due. Notwithstanding such provision, the entire assessment on any parcel may be paid before delinquency of the first installment. If any assessment is not evenly divisible by two, the odd cent shall be shown as a part of and included in the first installment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 380.)
-------------------------------------------

36951.

As soon as possible after the assessments, or any installment thereof, become delinquent, the tax collector shall publish a notice containing all of the following:

(a) A description of the delinquent property.

(b) The name of the assessee.

(c) The amount of the assessments and penalties due on the property.

(d) The amount of the assessments and penalties delinquent on the
 property.

(e) A statement that unless the delinquent assessments and penalties are paid at the district office by 12 noon on the date stated in the notice, the delinquent property will, on that date, be sold to the district for nonpayment of the delinquent assessments and penalties.

(f) A statement that subsequent to the sale of the delinquent property to the district, the property may be redeemed by payment of the amount specified in Section 37150 and, if applicable, Section 37155.2 or, if the district has elected pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 37175) to permit installment redemption pursuant to that chapter, that the delinquent property may be redeemed under an installment plan of redemption.

(g) A statement of the name, address, and telephone number of the official who will furnish all information
 concerning redemption.

(h) A statement that after three years from the date of sale of the delinquent property to the district the right of redemption may be terminated upon execution and delivery to the district of a collector’s deed pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 37150).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 560, Sec. 1.   Effective September 11, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

36952.

The notice required by Section 36951 shall be published in the county in which the property is located in the manner prescribed in Section 6063 of the Government Code, commencing not less than 21 days nor more than 28 days prior to the date required to be stated in the notice by subdivision (e) of Section 36951.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 560, Sec. 2.   Effective September 11, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

36953.

If any error should occur in the published notice with respect to the description of any delinquent property, the name of the assessee thereof, or the amount of the assessments and penalty due thereon which might invalidate a sale thereof and such error is discovered prior to sale, the collector shall at once republish a notice as to the property affected by the error, making such notice conform to the requirements of Sections 36951 and 36952. If any error should occur in the publication of the notice with respect to the time or place of publication or the requirements of Section 36952, and such error is discovered prior to sale, the collector shall at once republish the
 notice in conformity with all the requirements of Sections 36951 and 36952, specifying a date for the sale not less than 21 nor more than 28 days from the date of the first republication.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

36954.

On the day fixed for the sale in the published notice, or in any republished notice, the collector shall sell to the district the whole amount of each parcel of property separately assessed upon which the assessments and penalties due on the property remain unpaid for the amount of such assessment and penalty thereon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

36955.

Thereupon the collector shall, as to each parcel sold, make an entry “Sold to the district” in the assessment book, and the date of the sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

36956.

After the delinquent sale the collector shall make out, in duplicate, and sign a certificate of sale for each parcel separately assessed and sold, setting forth all of the following:

(a) A description of the property sold and the date of the sale.

(b) The name of the assessee.

(c) That the property was sold for the amount of the assessment and penalty thereon, giving the amount and year of the assessment.

(d) The date
 on which the purchaser will be entitled to a deed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

36957.

The certificate of sale may be substantially in the following form, the blanks being filled to show the facts in each case:Certificate of Sale No. _________________ Water DistrictI, the collector of ______________ Water District, certify that on the ____ day of ________, 19__, after
 giving the required notice, I sold to ______ Water District, the purchaser, for the sum of ______ dollars ($____) real property in the County of ______, State of California, described as follows:(insert description)This land was assessed to _______________. This property was sold for a delinquent assessment levied on it in the year _________ by the district, and the sale price was the sum due and unpaid on the assessment and penalty thereon. The purchaser will be entitled to a deed to the property at any time after three years from the date of sale, unless in the meantime the property is redeemed.
WITNESS MY HAND and the seal of the district this ______ dayof ________, 19__.(District Seal)Collector of ______ Water District

(History: Amended by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

36958.

Of each of the duplicate certificates of sale one shall be retained by the collector and the other shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the property is situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

36959.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part to the contrary, in the case of a sale of property for taxes or assessments, except where the sale is conducted and the funds are accounted for as provided in Division 1 (commencing with Section 101) of the Revenue and Taxation Code, all proceeds shall be accounted for and distributed as provided in Article 12 (commencing with Section 53925) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 648.)
-------------------------------------------

36960.

When property is sold for assessments imposed on it as the property of a particular person, no misnomer of the owner, or supposed owner, or any other mistake relating to the ownership, affects the sale or renders it void or voidable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Assessment After Sale to District [37050. - 37051.]

37050.

All property sold for delinquent assessments to the district shall subsequently be assessed for district purposes as though it had never been sold, until the collector has made and delivered to the district a collector’s deed, but shall not again be sold for delinquent assessments until after the property has been redeemed or has been sold by the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

37051.

If the property is sold to the district for delinquent assessments, the collector in making his accounting with the treasurer shall furnish a statement of the property sold to the district and the amount for which the property was sold. The treasurer shall thereupon estimate that portion of the amount belonging to the general obligation bond fund and shall charge the general fund with that portion and pay it from the general fund into the general obligation bond fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Redemption and its Termination [37150. - 37164.]

37150.

Property sold to the district for delinquent assessments may be redeemed by the redemptioner within three years from the date of sale, or thereafter before a collector’s deed of the property has been delivered, by payment in lawful money of the United States to the collector the sum of the following:

(a) The amount for which the property was sold, together with interest thereon at the rate of 9 percent per year from the date of sale, but not less than three-fourths of 1 percent for any portion of a month.

(b) The amount of assessments against the
 property, with the delinquent penalties thereon, assessed subsequent to sale, together with interest on such assessments as are delinquent and the penalties thereon at the rate of 9 percent per year from the date of delinquency, but not less than three-fourths of 1 percent for any portion of a month.

(c) The amount of the recorder’s fees in recording the certificate of sale and the certificate of redemption.

(d) The costs of publication of notice as required by Section 36951.

As used in this section, the “redemptioner” is the person whose estate has been sold, or his successor in interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

37151.

On receipt of the redemption money plus the amount of the recorder’s fee the collector shall make out duplicate certificates of redemption reciting the payment and stating the date of recordation of the certificate of sale to which the redemption applies and the book and page where the same is recorded or the recorder’s document number.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

37152.

One of the duplicate certificates of redemption shall be given to the redemptioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

37153.

The collector shall record the other duplicate certificate of redemption with the county recorder in whose office the certificate of sale is on record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

37155.

If the property sold for delinquent assessments has not been redeemed and three years have elapsed from the date of its sale to the district, the collector, upon demand made by resolution of the board and after giving the notice required by Section 37155.1, shall deliver a collector’s deed to the property to the district. The right of redemption shall terminate upon recording of the collector’s deed to the property by the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 560, Sec. 3.   Effective September 11, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

37155.1.

After receiving a demand for a collector’s deed pursuant to Section 37155, and not less than 45 days nor more than 60 days before delivery of a collector’s deed pursuant to that demand, the collector shall publish in the manner prescribed in Section 6063 of the Government Code a notice which shall contain all of the following:

(a) The date of the notice.

(b) A statement that as of a stated date, three years or more will have elapsed since the property or properties described in the notice were sold to the district pursuant
 to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 36950).

(c) A statement that on the stated date, the board, by resolution, demanded delivery of a collector’s deed to the property to the district.

(d) A statement that unless sooner redeemed, or, if the district has provided for installment redemption, an installment plan of redemption is initiated, a collector’s deed to the property will be delivered to the district.

(e) The date and time at which the collector’s deed will be executed and delivered.

(f) A statement that if the collector’s deed is executed and delivered the right of redemption will terminate.

(g) The name, address, and telephone number of the official who will furnish all information
 concerning redemption.

(h) The fiscal year or years for which the delinquent assessments were levied. 

(i) A description of the property.

(j) The amount required to redeem, which shall include the amounts specified in Section 37155.3.

(k) The name of the assessee on the current assessment book of the district. 

(l) The street address of the property, if available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 160, Sec. 185.)
-------------------------------------------

37155.2.

After the first publication of the notice required by Section 37155.1, and not less than 45 days, nor more than 60 days, before the date specified in that notice for the delivery of a collector’s deed, the collector shall send by certified mail to each of the parties of interest, as specified in this section, at his or her last known address a copy of the notice published pursuant to Section 37155.1. The collector shall make a reasonable effort to ascertain the names and addresses of each of the parties of interest, including, but not limited to, the securing of a lot book guarantee from a title insurer authorized to conduct
 business as such in this state with respect to the delinquent property, dated as of the date of the board’s demand resolution; an examination of the county’s assessments of the delinquent property on the rolls beginning with the year of delinquency to and including that of the last equalized roll; an examination of the most recent telephone books in the county in which the delinquent property is located; and an examination of the telephone books covering the area of the last known address of each party of interest.

For the purposes of this section, a “party of interest” is the holder of any interest in the delinquent property which would be terminated by execution and delivery of a collector’s deed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 560, Sec. 5.   Effective September 11, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

37155.3.

Upon first publication of the notice required by Section 37155.1, there shall be added to the amount to redeem as provided in Section 37150 the sum of the following:

(a) The cost of publication of the notice required by Section 37155.1.

(b) The cost of securing the lot book guarantee required by Section 37155.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 560, Sec. 6.   Effective September 11, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

37156.

A collector’s deed shall contain the date of sale and his statement that no person redeemed the property during the time allowed for its redemption; and may be in substantially the following form, the blanks being filled to show the facts in each case:

Collector’s Deed
______ Water District 

On the ____ day of _____, 19__, the collector of _____ Water District sold to _____ Water District, for a delinquent assessment, real property situated within the district, and in the County of _____, State of California, described as follows:

(insert description) 
No person has redeemed the property from the sale; the time for redemption has elapsed; and the purchaser has demanded a deed to the property.

Wherefore, I, the collector of _____ Water District grant to _____ Water District all of the real property aforesaid. 

WITNESS MY HAND and the seal of the district this ____ day of ____ 19__.(DISTRICT SEAL)Collector of ___________ Water District

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

37157.

A collector’s deed to a district shall be recorded in the usual manner of recording conveyances of real property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

37158.

The collector’s deed conveys to the district title to the property described therein free of all encumbrances, except liens for taxes and assessments levied for state, county, municipal or other district purposes, unless the property is owned by the United States or this State in which case it is prima facie evidence of the right of possession. The title acquired by the district may be sold at public auction or private sale and conveyed by deed executed and acknowledged by the president and secretary. Authority to convey shall be conferred by resolution of the board entered on its minutes fixing the sales price in the best interest of the district. The district may also lease
 or otherwise deal with the property as is in the best interest of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

37159.

A collector’s deed when acknowledged or proved is prima facie evidence that:

(a) The land was assessed as required by law.

(b) The land was equalized as required by law.

(c) The assessments were levied in accordance with law.

(d) The assessments were not paid.

(e) At a proper time and place the property was sold as prescribed by law.

(f) The property was not redeemed.

(g) The person who executed the deed was the proper officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

37160.

Except as against actual fraud a collector’s deed acknowledged or proved is conclusive evidence of the regularity of all of the proceedings from the assessment by the assessor, inclusive, up to the execution of the deed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

37161.

An action, proceeding, defense, answer, or cross-complaint based on the alleged invalidity or irregularity of any collector’s deed executed to the district or based on the alleged ineffectiveness of the deed to convey the absolute title to the property described in it may be commenced or interposed only within one year after the recordation of the deed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 244.)
-------------------------------------------

37162.

An action, proceeding, defense, answer, or cross-complaint based on the alleged invalidity or irregularity of any agreement of sale, deed, lease, or option executed by a district in connection with property deeded to it by its collector or based on the alleged ineffectiveness of the instrument to convey or affect the title to the property described in it may be commenced or interposed only within one year after the execution by the district of the instrument.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 244.)
-------------------------------------------

37163.

The provisions of Sections 37161 and 37162 do not apply in the following cases:

(a) Where the assessments for which the property was sold were paid before the sale.

(b) Where the property was redeemed after the sale.

(c) Where the land was not subject to assessment at the time it was assessed. 

(d) Where no assessments were due on the land at the time of sale.

(e) Where fraud is established.

(f) Where the deed is void on its face.

(g) Where the owner of the land was at the time of the sale a minor or insane person, in which case the earliest time that the statute of limitations begins to run is when the disability is removed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

37164.

The burden of proof shall be upon the party urging the invalidity, irregularity, or ineffectiveness of an agreement, deed, lease, or option described in Sections 37161 and 37162 or of any assessments, sales, or assessment deeds of which he complains to show the invalidity, irregularity, or ineffectiveness, and he shall be required to plead specifically the grounds upon which he urges the invalidity, irregularity, or ineffectiveness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Optional Provisions for Installment Redemption [37175. - 37186.]

37175.

This chapter provides an optional provision for the redemption, on an installment plan, of property sold to the district for delinquent assessments. The board may at any time, by resolution, elect to permit the redemption of property sold to the district for delinquent assessments according to the provisions of this chapter. The board may at any time thereafter, by further resolution, terminate such election, but no such termination shall affect a redemption plan then in effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

37176.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Redemption amount” means the total amount which would be necessary to redeem the property from sale for delinquent assessments at the time election is made to pay delinquent assessments in installments under this chapter.

(b) “Balance of the redemption amount” is the amount equal to the difference between the redemption amount and the total of the portions previously paid which portions were paid as a part of the redemption amount.

(c) “Redemptioner” is
 the person whose estate has been sold, or his successor in interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

37177.

During such time as the provisions of this chapter are effective in the district pursuant to a resolution adopted under authority of Section 37175, any person may elect to pay delinquent assessments in installments under this chapter at any time before a collector’s deed of the property has been delivered, except that if payment of delinquent assessments has been started under this chapter and the amount required to be paid in any fiscal year is not paid as required by this chapter, payment in installments may not again be started with respect to the same delinquent assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

37178.

During the time payments are made under this chapter, there shall not be:

(a) Delivery of a collector’s deed.

(b) Any termination of the right of redemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

37179.

Election to pay delinquent assessments in installments is made by payment, in the same manner as a redemption, of 3313 percent, or more, of the redemption amount. All current assessments, with penalties thereon, due or coming due for the fiscal year in which this first payment is made shall be paid before the delinquency date of the last installment of current assessments, except that if the election to pay delinquent assessments in installments is made on or after the delinquency date of the last installment of current assessments for any fiscal year, the current assessments,
 with penalties thereon, shall be paid with or prior to the installment payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

37180.

In each succeeding fiscal year, the redemptioner shall pay all current assessments and penalties coming due in that fiscal year before the delinquency date of the last installment of current assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

37181.

In each succeeding fiscal year, the redemptioner shall pay, before the delinquency date of the last installment of current assessments, the sum of the following:

(a) That amount which is computed to be not less than the difference between the amounts previously paid under the provisions of this chapter, excepting amounts paid as interest, and:

(1) 6623 percent of the redemption amount when the payment is made during or prior to the first fiscal year
 following the year in which election was made to pay delinquent assessments in installments.

(2) 100 percent of the redemption amount when the payment is made during or prior to the second fiscal year following the year in which election was made to pay delinquent assessments in installments.

(b) Interest, computed at the rate of three-fourths of 1 percent per month accruing on the first day of each month following the preceding payment, on the balance of the redemption amount.

Payments under this section shall be computed and paid in the same manner as a redemption, and the receipts for such payment shall show that the payments are for the use of the real estate under this plan for payment of delinquent assessments in installments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

37182.

If all payments are not made on or before the dates prescribed, a collector’s deed of the property may be delivered and the right of redemption may be terminated in the same manner as if no election to pay delinquent assessments in installments had been made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

37183.

Payments under this chapter are not a redemption or partial redemption and do not affect the district’s interest in the real estate. The payments are compensation for the use of the real estate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

37184.

If all payments under this chapter are made as prescribed and if redemption of the property is made before the delinquency date of the last installment of current assessments in the second fiscal year succeeding the fiscal year when the first payment was made, the amount necessary to redeem the property is the balance of the redemption amount with interest on such balance three-fourths of 1 percent accruing on the first day of each month following the last preceding payment to the date of redemption. When redemption is made under this section, no credit shall be allowed for amounts previously paid or credited.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

37185.

The redemption certificate for a redemption under this chapter shall show the following:

(a) The amounts used to arrive at the redemption amount at the time of an election to pay delinquent assessments in installments.

(b) The portions of the redemption amount and interest previously paid, including all credits allowed.

(c) The portion of the redemption amount and interest required to make the redemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

37186.

Excepting as provided in this chapter, the redemption shall be made in the manner provided by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 37150) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 7.5. ALTERNATIVE PROVISIONS FOR LEVY, COLLECTION AND ENFORCEMENT OF DISTRICT ASSESSMENTS BY THE COUNTY [37200. - 37214.]

37200.

This part provides an alternative method for the levy, collection and enforcement of district assessments and the provisions of this part shall not apply to or affect any other provisions of this division.
